Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act

§§79-11-601 through79-11-617.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2012, ch. 356, § 11, effective from and after July 1, 2012.

§79-11-601. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-603. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-605. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-607. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-609. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-611. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-613. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-615. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-11-617. [Laws, 1998, ch. 417, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

Former
§ 79-11-601 provided definitions of terms used in
§§ 79-11-601 through
79-11-617.

Former
§ 79-11-603 related to appropriations by the governing board
for expenditures for the uses and purposes for which an endowment fund was established.

Former
§ 79-11-605 related to the application of
§ 79-11-603 to certain gift instruments.

Former
§ 79-11-607 related to
the powers and duties of the governing board regarding investments.

Former
§ 79-11-609 related to
the powers and duties of the governing board regarding delegation, contracting and payment of compensation.

Former
§ 79-11-611 related to the governing board’s duty of care.

Former
§ 79-11-613 related to the release of restrictions imposed by gift instruments, donor consent, and application to the chancery court for release of a restriction.

Former
§ 79-11-615 related to the application and
construction of §§ 79-1-601 through
79-11-617.

Former
§ 79-11-617 provided that
§§ 79-11-601 through
79-11-617 may be cited as the “Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act.”

For present similar provisions, see
§§ 79-11-701 through
79-11-719.